Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-20] Law enforcement access to
dispensary and production center records. Notwithstanding any other law, the
department shall disclose information, documents, and other records regarding
medical marijuana dispensaries and production centers, upon request, to any
state, federal, or county agency engaged in the criminal investigation or
prosecution of violations of applicable state, county, or federal laws or
regulations related to the operations or activities of a medical marijuana
dispensary. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next